Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,100
Complaint.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall state with particularity:

(1) The date and content of the plaintiff's demand and the limited cooperative association's response to the demand; and

(2) If ninety days have not expired under subdivision (2) of section 21-2998, that irreparable injury to the limited cooperative association would result by waiting for the expiration of the time.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 100.